trunk/apertium-swe-dan/dev/tomerge-apertium-swe-dan.dan.dix
<pardef n="l/ang__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ang</l>       <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>angt</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ange</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ange</l>      <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ængere</l>    <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ængst</l>     <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ængste</l>    <r>ang<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/gammel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>gammel</l>    <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gammelt</l>   <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamle</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>gamle</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældre</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældst</l>     <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ældste</l>    <r>gammel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/lille__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små</l>       <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lille</l>     <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>små</l>       <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindre</l>    <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindst</l>    <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mindste</l>   <r>lille<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/stor__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>stor</l>      <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>stort</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>store</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>store</l>     <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>større</l>    <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>størst</l>    <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>største</l>   <r>stor<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/ung__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ung</l>       <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ungt</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unge</l>      <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngre</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngst</l>     <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yngste</l>    <r>ung<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sti/v__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>v</l>         <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ft</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ve</l>        <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>vere</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<!--
  <e>       <p><l>vest</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>veste</l>     <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
-->
  <e>       <p><l>vest</l>      <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>veste</l>     <r>v<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bit/ter__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ter</l>       <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tert</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rere</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rest</l>      <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>reste</l>     <r>ter<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="eg/en__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ent</l>       <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>et</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>en<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="aktiv__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="amerikansk__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="rå__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="gammel">          <i></i><par n="/gammel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lille">           <i></i><par n="/lille__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stor">            <i></i><par n="/stor__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ung">             <i></i><par n="/ung__adj"/></e>
<e lm="egen">            <i>eg</i><par n="eg/en__adj"/></e>
<e lm="akademisk">       <i>akademisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="aktiv">           <i>aktiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fuldstændig">     <i>fuldstændig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sand">            <i>sand</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="anatomisk">       <i>anatomisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="asiatisk">        <i>asiatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="belgisk">         <i>belgisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bitter">          <i>bit</i><par n="bit/ter__adj"/></e>
<e lm="blind">           <i>blind</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="daglig">          <i>daglig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dramatisk">       <i>dramatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="enlig">           <i>enlig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="finsk">           <i>finsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="flittig">         <i>flittig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fransk">          <i>fransk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gift">            <i>gift</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="giftig">          <i>giftig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hemmelig">        <i>hemmelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hvid">            <i>hvid</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="interessant">     <i>interessant</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="international">   <i>international</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kolossal">        <i>kolossal</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lang">            <i>l</i><par n="l/ang__adj"/></e>
<e lm="legal">           <i>legal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mandlig">         <i>mandlig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mulig">           <i>mulig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naiv">            <i>naiv</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naturlig">        <i>naturlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="norsk">           <i>norsk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyligt" a="PT">           <i>nyligt</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="offensiv">        <i>offensiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="passiv">          <i>passiv</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="psykisk">         <i>psykisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rar">             <i>rar</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rå">              <i>rå</i><par n="rå__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sandsynlig">      <i>sandsynlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="skyldig">         <i>skyldig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="social">          <i>social</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="springende" a="PT">           <i>springende</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stiv">            <i>sti</i><par n="sti/v__adj"/></e>
<e lm="svag">            <i>svag</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sympatisk">       <i>sympatisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trist">           <i>trist</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tynd">            <i>tynd</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uenig">           <i>uenig</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vanskelig">       <i>vanskelig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vred">            <i>vred</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="indisk">          <i>indisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="økonomisk">       <i>økonomisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="etnisk">          <i>etnisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sovjetisk">       <i>sovjetisk</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kendt">           <i>kendt</i><par n="amerikansk__adj"/></e>
<e lm="daglig">          <i>daglig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utaknemlig">      <i>utaknemlig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="samtidig">        <i>samtidig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="myndig">          <i>myndig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="retfærdig">       <i>retfærdig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uregelmæssig">    <i>uregelmæssig</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bar">             <i>bar</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kolossal">        <i>kolossal</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
<e lm="død">             <i>død</i><par n="aktiv__adj"/></e>
